Washington statutes.
RCW 23.100.0415

Manner of voting.

(1) Unless the organic rules otherwise provide, voting by a proxy at a members meeting is prohibited. This subsection does not prohibit delegate voting based on district or class.

(2) If voting by a proxy is permitted, a patron member may appoint only another patron member as a proxy and, if investor members are permitted, an investor member may appoint only another investor member as a proxy.

(3) The organic rules may provide for the manner of and provisions governing the appointment of a proxy.

(4) The organic rules may provide for voting on any question by ballot delivered by mail or voting by other means on questions that are subject to vote by members.

[ 2019 c 37 s 415.]